Kentucky statutes. TITLE XXIV Public Utilities
Public Utilities Generally
278.440.
Evidence to be heard by court — Remand.

Any action brought under KRS

278.410

shall be heard and decided by the court upon the evidence submitted to the commission as shown by the record, and no other evidence shall be received. If any party satisfies the court that evidence has been discovered since the hearing before the commission that could not have been obtained for use at that hearing by the exercise of reasonable diligence and will materially affect the merits of the case, the court may remand the record and proceedings to the commission, with directions to take the newly-discovered evidence, and after consideration thereof, enter and file a proper order, which may be reviewed in the same manner as any other final order of the commission.

History.

3952-47, 3952-50: amend. 1990, ch. 149, § 2, effective July 13, 1990; 1990, ch. 354, § 3, effective July 13, 1990.

Legislative Research Commission Note.

(7/13/90). This section was amended by identical amendments in two 1990 Acts, which have been compiled together.

278.450.
Judgment of Circuit Court — Appeal to Court of Appeals.

Upon final submission of any action brought under KRS

278.410

, the Circuit Court shall enter a judgment either sustaining the order of the commission or setting it aside or vacating it in whole or in part, or modifying it, or remanding it to the commission with instructions. Any final order of the commission, on remand of the proceedings, shall be subject to court review in the same manner as any other final order of the commission. Either party to the action may appeal from the judgment of the Circuit Court to the Court of Appeals in accordance with the Rules of Civil Procedure.

History.

3952-50, 3952-51: amend. Acts 1952, ch. 46, § 5; 1960, ch. 104, § 18; 1976, ch. 62, § 111.

278.455.
Reduction of operating expenses by G&T or distribution cooperative — Effect on rates — Authority for administrative regulations.

Notwithstanding any other statute to the contrary, a G&T or distribution cooperative may at any time decrease regulated operating revenues by an amount to be determined solely by the cooperative utility. If the revenue reduction is allocated among and within the consumer classes on a proportional basis that will result in no change in the rate design currently in effect, the revised rates and tariffs shall be authorized and made permanent on the proposed effective date.

Notwithstanding any other statute, any revenue increase authorized by the Public Service Commission or any revenue decrease authorized in subsection (1) of this section that is to flow through the effects of an increase or decrease in wholesale rates may, at the distribution cooperative’s discretion, be allocated to each class and within each tariff on a proportional basis that will result in no change in the rate design currently in effect. In the event of an increase in the wholesale rates and tariffs of the wholesale supplier by the Public Service Commission, the rates and tariffs of the distribution cooperative that have been revised on a proportional basis to result in no change in the rate design shall be authorized and shall become effective on the same date as those of the wholesale supplier. In those cases where an interim increase in the power supplier’s wholesale rates is authorized, the distribution cooperative’s flow through rates shall be interim. The distribution cooperative’s permanent rates and tariffs shall become effective on the date that the wholesale supplier’s permanent rates become effective as ordered by the commission.

Any rate increase or decrease as provided for in subsections (1) and (2) of this section shall not apply to special contracts under which the rates are subject to change or adjustment only as stipulated in the contract.

The Public Service Commission shall promulgate administrative regulations pursuant to KRS Chapter 13A to establish filing requirements and notice requirements to the commission, the Attorney General, and the public under this section.

History.

Enact. Acts 1998, ch. 188, § 2, effective July 15, 1998.

278.457.
Commission’s duty to transmit information concerning abandonment of railroad corridor to Department of Parks and Railtrail Development Office.

The Public Service Commission shall immediately transmit to the Department of Parks and to the Commonwealth’s Railtrail Development Office in the Department for Local Government any information received from a railroad or other person having an ownership interest in a railroad corridor pertaining to a proposed or pending action or proceeding to obtain federal authority for the regulatory abandonment of that railroad corridor.

History.

Enact. Acts 2000, ch. 338, § 11, effective July 14, 2000; 2007, ch. 47, § 93, effective June 26, 2007; 2010, ch. 117, § 88, effective July 15, 2010.